Illinois, session 104th, SB1613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 529-21 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/29-21 new)7    Sec. 29-21. Proper use of seat safety belts on school 8buses.9    (a) A public or nonpublic school, school district, 10transportation provider or contractor, or other entity 11operating a school bus shall provide written or verbal 12instruction concerning the availability and correct use of 13seat safety belts to student passengers and their parents or 14legal guardians. This includes instructing passengers on the 15correct use, fastening, and unfastening of seat safety belts. 16This instruction shall occur at least 2 times per calendar or 17school year.18    Before July 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall 19provide guidance for school districts on how to provide the 20written and verbal instruction required under this Section to 21student passengers and their parents or legal guardians on its 22website.23    (b) A school bus driver or aide shall provide a verbal or   SB1613- 2 -LRB104 08626 LNS 18678 b1posted reminder to all passengers to fasten their seat safety 2belts properly before the bus begins to move. This reminder is 3to be given prior to the start of each trip.4    (c) Nothing in this Section makes a public or nonpublic 5school, school district, transportation provider or 6contractor, or other entity operating a school bus, such as a 7bus driver, bus aide, volunteer, or other staff, liable for a 8passenger's failure to correctly adjust and fasten a seat 9safety belt or other restraint system under this Section.10    (d) No public or nonpublic school, school district, 11transportation provider or contractor, or other entity 12operating a school bus, such as a bus driver, bus aide, 13volunteer, or other staff, is liable for damages for an injury 14resulting solely from a passenger's use, misuse, or failure to 15use a seat safety belt installed on a school bus. 16    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 17Section 12-826 as follows: 18    (625 ILCS 5/12-826 new)19    Sec. 12-826. Proper use of seat safety belts on school 20buses.21    (a) As used in this Section, "school bus" includes a 22school bus, school activity bus, multi-function school 23activity bus, or school-chartered bus.24    (b) Beginning August 1, 2026, if a school bus has one or   SB1613- 3 -LRB104 08626 LNS 18678 b1more designated passenger seating positions equipped with a 2seat safety belt system, those seats shall be prioritized for 3use and the seat safety belt shall be worn correctly by the 4passengers of the school bus. A public or nonpublic school, 5school district, transportation provider or contractor, or 6other entity operating a school bus shall instruct passengers 7on the correct use of seat safety belt systems as defined by 8the school bus manufacturer's instructions or Section 29-21 of 9the School Code. Enforcement is the responsibility of the 10public or nonpublic school, school district, transportation 11provider or contractor, or other entity operating a school bus 12at the time of transportation.13    (c) When operating other vehicles not defined as a school 14bus, a public or nonpublic school, school district, 15transportation provider or contractor, or other entity 16transporting children must adhere to the occupant restraint 17requirements of the Child Passenger Protection Act.18    (d) A public or nonpublic school, school district, 19transportation provider or contractor, or other entity 20operating a school bus shall not be charged for a violation of 21this Code or any rule adopted under this Code requiring a 22passenger to use a seat safety belt system if a passenger on 23the school bus fails to use or incorrectly uses the seat safety 24belt system, as long as the other provisions of this Section 25have been followed. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB1613- 4 -LRB104 08626 LNS 18678 b1becoming law.  SB1613- 5 -LRB104 08626 LNS 18678 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    105 ILCS 5/29-21 new4    625 ILCS 5/12-826 new